Louisiana, session 2026, SB205.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:851.19 and 851.22(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§851.19. Operation of unnumbered motorboats, houseboats, or sailboats prohibited;
exception
Every undocumented motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat operated on the
waters of this state shall be numbered. No person shall operate or give permission
for the operation of any motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat on such waters unless the
motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat is numbered in accordance with this Part or in
accordance with applicable federal law or in accordance with a federally approved
numbering system of another state, and unless the certificate of number awarded to
the motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat is in full force and effect, and the identifying
number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of
the motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat as provided in this Part.
* * *
§851.22. Exemption from numbering system
A. A motorboat shall not be required to be numbered under this Part if it is:
(1) Already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been
awarded to it pursuant to federal law or.
(2) Already covered by a federally approved numbering system of another
state; however, such boat shall not have been within this state for a period in excess
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 205 ENROLLED
of ninety consecutive days.
(2) (3) A motorboat from a country other than the United States temporarily
using the waters of this state.
(3) (4) A public vessel of the United States, a state, or a subdivision thereof.
(4) (5) A ship's lifeboat.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.